Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.110

Housing—Energy assistance.

(1) The department shall maintain an active effort to help communities, families, and individuals build and maintain capacity to meet housing needs in Washington state. The department shall facilitate partnerships among the many entities related to housing issues and leverage a variety of resources and services to produce comprehensive, cost-effective, and innovative housing solutions.

(2) The department shall assist in the production, development, rehabilitation, and operation of owner-occupied or rental housing for very low, low, and moderate-income persons; operate programs to assist homeownership, offer housing services, and provide emergency, transitional, and special needs housing services; and qualify as a participating state agency for all programs of the federal department of housing and urban development or its successor. The department shall develop or assist local governments in developing housing plans required by the state or federal government.

(3) The department shall coordinate and administer energy assistance and residential energy conservation and rehabilitation programs of the federal and state government through nonprofit organizations, local governments, and housing authorities.

[ 1993 c 280 s 14.]